District of Columbia statutes.
7-212

Delayed filing and registration of death.

(a)

A delayed certificate of death may be filed in accordance with regulations issued by the Registrar, when a death occurring in the District has not been registered within the time period specified in § 7-211. Any delayed certificate shall be registered subject to such evidentiary requirements as the Registrar shall prescribe by regulation in order to substantiate the alleged facts of death.

(b)

A certificate of death registered 1 year or more after the date of death shall be marked “delayed” and shall show on its face the date of the delayed registration.

History

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 13, 28 DCR 3271

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-212.